Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 230

Derivative Actions and Equitable Remedies

48-230-101. Actions.

Board-managed Action. A member may not commence a proceeding in the right of a domestic (or foreign) LLC unless the member was a member of such LLC when the transaction complained of occurred or unless the member becomes a member through transfer by operation of law from one who was a member at that time.

Member-managed Action. Notwithstanding subsection (a), if the articles or operating agreement of a domestic (or foreign) member-managed LLC permit derivative actions, a member may commence a proceeding to the same extent as a member of a board-managed LLC.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-230-102. Complaint.

A complaint in a proceeding brought in the right of an LLC must allege with particularity the demand made, if any, to obtain action by the board of governors or managers and either that the demand was refused or ignored or why the member did not make the demand.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-230-103. Discontinuance.

A proceeding commenced under this section may not be discontinued or settled without the court's approval. If the court determines that a proposed discontinuance or settlement will substantially affect the interest of the LLC or a class of members and/or holders of financial rights, the court shall direct that notice be given the members and/or holders of financial rights affected. If notice is so directed to be given, the court may determine which one (1) or more parties to the suit shall bear the expense of giving such notice, in such proportions as the court finds to be reasonable in the circumstances, and the amount of such expense shall be awarded as special costs of the suit and recoverable in the same manner as other taxable costs.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-230-104. Award of expenses.

On termination of the proceeding, the court may require the plaintiff to pay any defendant's reasonable expenses (including counsel fees) incurred in defending the proceeding if it finds that the proceeding was commenced without reasonable cause.

If a derivative action is successful in whole or in part, or if anything is received by the plaintiff as a result of a judgment, compromise or settlement of any such action, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees. If anything is so received by the plaintiff, the court shall make such award of the plaintiff's expenses payable out of those proceeds and direct the plaintiff to remit to the LLC the remainder thereof, and if those proceeds are insufficient to reimburse the plaintiff's reasonable expenses, the court may direct that any such award of the plaintiff's expenses or portion thereof be paid by the LLC.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.

48-230-105. Equitable remedies.

If an LLC or a manager or governor of the LLC violates a provision of chapters 201-248 of this title, a court in this state may, in an action brought by a member of the LLC, grant any equitable relief it considers just and reasonable in the circumstances and award expenses, including counsel fees and disbursements, to the member.

Acts 1994, ch. 868, § 1.